Hawaii statutes.
[§346G-1] Title. This
chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Hospital Sustainability
Program Act". [L 2012, c 217, pt of §2, §5; am L 2013, c 141, pt of §1,
§2; am L 2014, c 123, §2; am L 2015, c 70, §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next